Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 9.1
Donation of Medications for Use by Nonprofit, State, and Local Facilities

4-9.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Animal rescue” means an entity, without a physical brick-and-mortar facility, that is owned, operated, or maintained by a duly incorporated humane society, animal welfare society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other nonprofit organization.

“Animal shelter” means a brick-and-mortar facility that is used to house or contain animals and that is owned, operated, or maintained by a duly incorporated humane society, animal welfare society, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, or other nonprofit organization devoted to the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals.

“Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation of which no part of the income or profit is distributable to its members, directors, or officers, except as otherwise expressly permitted by chapter 6 of title 7.

“Pound” or “Dog pound” means a facility operated by the state, or any political subdivision of the state, for the purpose of impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless, abandoned, or unwanted dogs, cats, and other animals, or a facility operated for that purpose under contract with any municipal corporation or incorporated society for the prevention of cruelty to animals.

“Veterinarian-client patient relationship” or “VCPR” means a relationship where all of the following conditions have been met:

The veterinarian has assumed the responsibility for making medical judgments regarding the health of the animal or animals and the need for medical treatment, and the client (i.e., animal owner or custodian) has agreed to follow the instructions of the veterinarian.

The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the animal or animals to initiate at least a general or preliminary (e.g., tentative) diagnosis of the medical condition of the animal or animals. “Sufficient knowledge,” as used in this subsection, means that the veterinarian has recently seen and is personally acquainted with the keeping and care of the animal or animals, and/or by medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal or animals are kept.

The veterinarian is readily available for follow-up in cases of adverse reactions or failure of the regimen of therapy.

The veterinarian maintains records that document patient visits, diagnosis, treatment, and other relevant information.

“Veterinary clinic” means any premises to which animals are brought or where they are temporarily kept, solely for the purpose of diagnosis or treatment of any illness or injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

4-9.1-2.
Allowable medication donations.

An owner of an animal may donate a drug that is dispensed for the animal, but will not be used by that animal, to a licensed veterinarian or a facility in which veterinary medicine is practiced if the licensed veterinarian or facility chooses to accept the drug.

Except as provided in §

4-9.1-3

, a licensed veterinarian may reissue a drug accepted pursuant to this section to fill other prescriptions provided that:

The veterinarian is licensed to practice veterinary medicine in Rhode Island;

The drug is being dispensed to fill a prescription needed to treat an animal under the care of a Rhode Island registered nonprofit shelter, municipal pound, shelter, veterinary clinic, or animal rescue facility;

Wildlife rehabilitators licensed by the state of Rhode Island will have access to these medications under the direction of a licensed Rhode Island veterinarian;

The prescription is authorized by the veterinarian within a valid VCPR;

The licensed veterinarian determines that the drug is suitable for that purpose; and

The drug was originally dispensed by a licensed veterinarian, a facility in which veterinary medicine is practiced that is licensed by the state of Rhode Island, a licensed pharmacy, an internet pharmacy that is accredited through the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy’s Veterinary-Verified Internet Pharmacy Practice Sites program, or its successor.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

4-9.1-3.
Drugs not eligible for donation or reissuance.

Drugs that will not be eligible for reissuance include:

Drugs classified as a controlled substance;

Drugs that require refrigeration unless it is a drug that only requires refrigeration after being opened and the drug is donated in an unopened condition; and

Drugs where the packaging or bottle does not list the expiration date of the usefulness of the drug.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

4-9.1-4.
Reissuance of medications.

Any reissued medication shall have the name of the animal and the name of the owner of the animal for which the drug was originally dispensed, the prescription number, and any other identifying marks obliterated from the packaging or bottle before the reissuance of the drug. When medication is reissued to owned pets, the owner will be informed as to the fact that the medication is supplied from a supply of turnover medications.

A licensed veterinarian may not reissue a drug accepted pursuant to this section to fill other prescriptions dispensed by the licensed veterinarian for an animal if the animal is raised to produce food for human consumption or the animal is ordinarily consumed by animals that are raised to produce food for human consumption.

For expired medications, the veterinarian may elect to reissue these medications if they are unopened and from a period of one year from their expiration date if the veterinarian determines the medication to continue to maintain efficacy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

4-9.1-5.
Immunity from civil or criminal liability.

A licensed veterinarian or a facility or agency in which veterinary medicine is practiced with one or more full-time or part-time veterinarians that complies with the provisions of this chapter in the donation, acceptance, distribution, or dispensation of a drug in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto is not subject to any civil or criminal liability or disciplinary action by a professional licensing board for any loss, injury, or death that results from the donation, acceptance, distribution, or dispensation of the drug.

A manufacturer of a drug is not subject to civil or criminal liability for any claim or injury arising from the donation, acceptance, distribution, or dispensation of the drug pursuant to this chapter and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

4-9.1-6.
Sale of donated medications prohibited.

A licensed veterinarian, shelter, pound, animal rescue, or humane society shall not sell or resell any drug accepted pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

4-9.1-7.
Handling of donated medications.

The facility receiving the turnover medication shall:

Identify and maintain separately from other stock any drug accepted pursuant to this chapter; and

Make a record of each drug accepted pursuant to this chapter that includes, without limitation:

The date on which the drug was donated;

The name of the person who donated the drug; and

The expiration date of the drug.

Any for-profit or nonprofit facility receiving turnover medications may then donate them to another qualifying nonprofit facility provided that subsequent responsibility for identifying and using the drug becomes the responsibility of the facility receiving the donation.

All records must be maintained for not less than two (2) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.

4-9.1-8.
Rules and regulations.

The board of veterinary medicine shall promulgate any rules or regulations deemed necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including, without limitation:

Requirements for reissuing drugs pursuant to this chapter, including, without limitation, requirements that provide appropriate safeguards for ensuring that the drugs are not compromised or illegally diverted before being reissued;

Requirements for accepting drugs donated to a licensed veterinarian or facility in which veterinary medicine is practiced pursuant to this chapter; and

Requirements for maintaining records relating to the acceptance and use of drugs to fill other prescriptions pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 149, § 1, effective July 3, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 3, 2021.